Colorado, session 2026A, HB1179.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-302, amend
(2.3)(p) and (2.3)(q); and add (2.3)(r) as follows:
24-75-302. Capital construction fund - capital assessment fees -
calculation - information technology capital account - repeal.
(2.3) In addition to the sums transferred pursuant to subsections (2)
and (2.5) of this section, the state treasurer and the controller shall transfer
a sum as specified in this subsection (2.3) from the general fund to the
information technology capital account created in subsection (3.7) of this
section as money becomes available in the general fund during the fiscal
year beginning on July 1 of the fiscal year in which the transfer is made or
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

on April 1 of the fiscal year if otherwise specified. Transfers between funds
pursuant to this subsection (2.3) are not appropriations subject to the
limitations of section 24-75-201.1. The amounts transferred pursuant to this
subsection (2.3) are as follows:
(p) On July 1, 2024, seventy million eight hundred eleven thousand
three hundred thirty-four dollars; and
(q) On July 1, 2025, twenty million five hundred fifty-seven
thousand four hundred thirty-three dollars; AND
(r) ON APRIL 1, 2026, THREE MILLION SIX HUNDRED FORTY-SIX
THOUSAND FOUR HUNDRED TWENTY DOLLARS.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1179

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1179